Nevada, session 83, SB49.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 and 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. NRS 598.0963 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.0963 1. Whenever the Attorney General is requested in
writing by the Commissioner or the Director to represent him or her
in instituting a legal proceeding against a person who has engaged
or is engaging in a deceptive trade practice, the Attorney General
may bring an action in the name of the State of Nevada against that
person on behalf of the Commissioner or Director.
2. The Attorney General may institute criminal proceedings to
enforce the provisions of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive. The
Attorney General is not required to obtain leave of the court before
instituting criminal proceedings pursuant to this subsection.
3. If the Attorney General has reason to believe that a person
has engaged or is engaging in a deceptive trade practice, the
Attorney General may bring an action in the name of the State of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Nevada against that person to obtain a temporary restraining order, a
preliminary or permanent injunction, or other appropriate relief,
including, without limitation, the recovery of a civil penalty,
disgorgement, restitution , [or] the recovery of damages [:] or any
other available remedy pursuant to NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999,
inclusive, on behalf of:
(a) The State, its agencies, political subdivisions, districts or
municipal corporations; or
(b) The persons residing in this State:
[(a)] (1) As parens patriae of the persons residing in this State,
with respect to damages sustained directly or indirectly by such
persons, or, alternatively, if the court finds in its discretion that the
interests of justice so require, as a representative of a class or classes
consisting of persons residing in this State who have been damaged
directly or indirectly; or
[(b)] (2) As parens patriae, with respect to direct or indirect
damages to the general economy of the State of Nevada or any
agency or political subdivision thereof.
4. If the Attorney General has cause to believe that a person
has engaged or is engaging in a deceptive trade practice, the
Attorney General may issue a subpoena to require the testimony of
any person or the production of any documents, and may administer
an oath or affirmation to any person providing such testimony. The
subpoena must be served upon the person in the manner required for
service of process in this State or by certified mail with return
receipt requested. An employee of the Attorney General may
personally serve the subpoena.
Sec. 4. NRS 598.0971 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.0971 1. If, after an investigation, the Commissioner or
Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that any person
has been engaged or is engaging in any deceptive trade practice in
violation of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive, the
Commissioner or Attorney General may issue an order directed to
the person to show cause why the Director should not order the
person to cease and desist from engaging in the practice and to pay
an administrative fine. The order must contain a statement of the
charges and a notice of a hearing to be held thereon. The order must
be served upon the person directly, by certified or registered mail,
return receipt requested, or in any other manner permitted by the
Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of process in civil
actions.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. An administrative hearing on any action brought by the
Commissioner or Attorney General must be conducted before the
Director or his or her designee.
3. If, after conducting a hearing pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 2, the Director or his or her designee determines that the
person has violated any of the provisions of NRS 598.0903 to
598.0999, inclusive, or if the person fails to appear for the hearing
after being properly served with the statement of charges and notice
of hearing, the Director or his or her designee shall issue an order
setting forth his or her findings of fact concerning the violation and
cause to be served a copy thereof upon the person and any
intervener at the hearing. If the Director or his or her designee
determines in the report that such a violation has occurred, he or she
may order the violator to:
(a) Cease and desist from engaging in the practice or other
activity constituting the violation;
(b) Pay the costs of conducting the investigation, costs of
conducting the hearing, costs of reporting services, fees for experts
and other witnesses, charges for the rental of a hearing room if such
a room is not available to the Director or his or her designee free of
charge, charges for providing an independent hearing officer, if any,
and charges incurred for any service of process, if the violator is
adjudicated to have committed a violation of NRS 598.0903 to
598.0999, inclusive;
(c) Provide restitution for any money or property improperly
received or obtained as a result of the violation; and
(d) Impose an administrative fine of [$1,000] not more than
$15,000 for each violation or treble the amount of restitution
ordered, whichever is greater.
 The order must be served upon the person directly , [or] by
certified or registered mail, return receipt requested [.] or any other
manner permitted by the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure for the
service of process in civil actions. The order becomes effective
upon service in the manner provided in this subsection.
4. Any person whose pecuniary interests are directly and
immediately affected by an order issued pursuant to subsection 3 or
who is aggrieved by the order may petition for judicial review in the
manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS. Such a petition must be
filed within 30 days after the service of the order. The order
becomes final upon the filing of the petition.
5. If a person fails to comply with any provision of an order
issued by the Director or his or her designee pursuant to subsection
3, the Attorney General, or the Commissioner or the Director
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
through the Attorney General, may, at any time after 30 days after
the service of the order, cause an action to be instituted in the
district court of the county wherein the person resides or has his or
her principal place of business requesting the court to enforce the
provisions of the order or to provide any other appropriate
injunctive relief.
6. If the court finds that the person has failed to comply with an
order issued by the Director or his or her designee pursuant to
subsection 3, the court shall issue an order enforcing the provisions
of the order of the Director or his or her designee.
7. An order issued pursuant to subsection 6 may include:
(a) A provision requiring the payment to the Consumer Affairs
Unit of the Department of Business and Industry of a penalty of not
more than $5,000 for each act amounting to a failure to comply with
the Director’s or designee’s order;
(b) An order that the person cease doing business within this
State; and
(c) Such injunctive or other equitable or extraordinary relief as
is determined appropriate by the court.
8. Any aggrieved party may appeal from the final judgment,
order or decree of the court in a like manner as provided for appeals
in civil cases.
9. Upon the violation of any judgment, order or decree issued
pursuant to subsection 6 or 7, the Commissioner, after a hearing
thereon, may proceed in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 598.0999.
Secs. 5-10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. NRS 228.334 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.334 1. After any reversion of money from the Consumer
Protection Administrative Account to the Consumer Protection
Legal Account in accordance with subsection 3 of NRS 228.332, the
Attorney General shall allocate the money in the Consumer
Protection Legal Account as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the Office of the Attorney General or the
Consumer’s Advocate, to be used for consumer protection and
efforts to prevent fraud, including, without limitation, education,
investigation, enforcement and litigation. [Beginning on July 1,
2023, the] The Office of the Attorney General or the Consumer’s
Advocate, as applicable [:
(1) May] , may use money allocated pursuant to this
paragraph to pay for [necessary:] :
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(1) Necessary staff employed pursuant to NRS 228.330 for
the Consumer’s Advocate to carry out such consumer protection
and efforts to prevent fraud; [and]
(2) [If the amount of money in the Account that is allocated
pursuant to this paragraph exceeds the amount required to pay for
120 days of operating costs for necessary] Necessary staff for the
Office of the Attorney General to carry out such consumer
protection and efforts to prevent fraud [, may use any such excess
amount of money for additional purposes] ; and
(3) Any other additional purpose relating to consumer
protection and efforts to prevent fraud.
(b) Fifty percent to the following legal aid organizations, or their
successors, in the following percentages:
(1) Seventy percent to the organization operating the
program for legal services in a county whose population is 700,000
or more that receives the fees charged pursuant to NRS 19.031 for
programs for the indigent, to be used to provide legal services in a
county whose population is 700,000 or more;
(2) Nineteen percent to the organization operating the
program for legal services in counties whose population is less than
100,000 that receive the fees charged pursuant to NRS 19.031 for
programs for the indigent, to be used to provide legal services in
those counties; and
(3) Eleven percent to the organization operating the program
for legal services in a county whose population is 100,000 or more
but less than 700,000 that receives the fees charged pursuant to NRS
19.031 for programs for the indigent, to be used to provide legal
services in a county whose population is 100,000 or more but less
than 700,000.
2. Each legal aid organization listed in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 shall:
(a) Use the money received from the Account for consumer
protection and efforts to prevent fraud, including, without limitation,
education and litigation; and
(b) On or before January 1 and July 1 of each year, submit a
report to the Office of the Attorney General that includes a detailed
summary of all activities undertaken by the legal aid organization
during the previous 6-month period with the money received from
the Account, including, without limitation:
(1) Activities relating to consumer protection and the
prevention of fraud;
(2) Litigation;
(3) Educational activities;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(4) Statistical information on the number of persons served;
and
(5) An accounting of the use of the money, including,
without limitation, the specific amount of money used for salaries,
costs and expenses.
3. On or before July 1 of each year, each legal aid organization
listed in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 shall submit to the Office of
the Attorney General an audited statement regarding the use of
money received from the Account during the previous calendar
year.
4. The Office of the Attorney General is entitled to audit,
examine or inspect the books and records of each legal aid
organization listed in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 at any time
regarding the use of money received from the Account.
Sec. 12. NRS 228.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.380 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Consumer’s Advocate may exercise the power of the Attorney
General in areas of consumer protection, including, but not limited
to, enforcement of chapters 90, 597, 598, 598A, 598B, 598C, 599B
and 711 of NRS.
2. The Consumer’s Advocate may not exercise any powers to
enforce any criminal statute set forth in:
(a) Chapter 90, 597, 598, 598A, 598B, 598C or 599B of NRS
for any transaction or activity that involves a proceeding before the
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada if the Consumer’s Advocate
is participating in that proceeding as a real party in interest on behalf
of the customers or a class of customers of utilities; or
(b) Chapter 711 of NRS.
3. The Consumer’s Advocate may have access to all records in
the possession of any agency, board or commission of this State that
he or she determines are necessary for the exercise of the powers set
forth in subsection 1. The Consumer’s Advocate does not have
custody or control of any record until the Consumer’s Advocate
receives the record from the agency, board or commission of this
State. If a record that is received by the Consumer’s Advocate
pursuant to this subsection is confidential and not a public record
when in the custody or control of the agency, board or
commission, the record is confidential and not a public record
when in the custody or control of the Consumer’s Advocate.
4. The Consumer’s Advocate may expend revenues derived
from NRS 704.033 only for activities directly related to the
protection of customers of public utilities.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
5. The powers of the Consumer’s Advocate do not extend to
proceedings before the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada
directly relating to discretionary or competitive telecommunication
services.
Sec. 12.5. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.380, 228.450, 228.495,
228.570, 231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada
2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and
unless otherwise declared by law to be confidential, all public books
and public records of a governmental entity must be open at all
times during office hours to inspection by any person, and may be
fully copied or an abstract or memorandum may be prepared from
those public books and public records. Any such copies, abstracts or
memoranda may be used to supply the general public with copies,
abstracts or memoranda of the records or may be used in any other
way to the advantage of the governmental entity or of the general
public. This section does not supersede or in any manner affect the
federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in
any other manner the rights of a person in any written book or
record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 13. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)